Washington statutes.
RCW 43.190.050

Posting of notice by long-term care facility—Distribution of information to residents.

Every long-term care facility shall post in a conspicuous location a notice of the nursing home complaint toll-free number and the name, address, and phone number of the office of the appropriate long-term care ombuds and a brief description of the services provided by the office. The form of the notice shall be approved by the office and the organization responsible for maintaining the nursing home complaint toll-free number. This information shall also be distributed to the residents, family members, and legal guardians upon the resident's admission to the facility.

[ 2013 c 23 s 91; 1983 c 290 s 5.]